ClassA-ii/a6.foma
### Sinhala.foma ###

# Vowels
define A [ක | ​ඛ | ග | ​ඝ | ච | ​ඡ | ජ | ට | ඨ | ඩ | ඪ | ණ | ත | ද | ධ | න | ප | ඵ | බ | භ | ම | ය | ර | ල | ව | ශ | ෂ | ස | හ | ළ | ​ෆ | ඟ | ඬ | ඳ | ඹ];

define B [ ු ණ ු | ූ | ෙ ම ි | ෙ ම ු | ෙ හ ි | ෙ හ ු | ා ය | ේ ය | ෝ ය | ේ | ෙ ය ි | ෙ ත ි | ව ෙ ය ි | ව ෙ ත ි | ව ේ | ි ය | ු ව ො ත ් | ු ව ේ];



read lexc a6.lexc
define Lexicon;

######### Rewrite rules

define PalandaClass        [..]  -> ැ || .#. A _ A A ් A  "^" B ;
define BassaClass        [..]  -> ැ || A _ A ් A  "^" B ;
define AndaClass           අ  -> ඇ || .#. _ A ් A  "^" B ;

# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define ClassOneGrammar 	Lexicon             .o.
                        PalandaClass        .o.
                        BassaClass          .o.
                        AndaClass           .o.
               	        Cleanup;

regex ClassOneGrammar;
